Missouri, session 2026, SB1289.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 303.020, 303.190, and 379.204, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 303.020, 303.190, and 379.204, to read as
follows:
303.020. As used in this chapter the following words
and phrases shall mean:
(1) "Chauffeur", a person who is employed for the
principal purpose of operating a motor vehicle or any person
who drives a motor vehicle while in use as a public or
common carrier of persons or property for hire;
(2) "Director", director of revenue of the state of
Missouri, acting directly or through his authorized officers
and agents;
(3) "Judgment", a final judgment by a court of
competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States,
upon a claim for relief for damages, including damages for
care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or
death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or
destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof,
or upon a claim for relief on any agreement or settlement
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1289 2
for such damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance
or use of any motor vehicle;
(4) "License", an operator's or driver's license,
temporary instruction permit, chauffeur's or registered
operator's license issued under the laws of this state;
(5) "Motor vehicle", a self-propelled vehicle which is
designed for use upon a highway, except trailers designed
for use with such vehicles, traction engines, road rollers,
farm tractors, tractor cranes, power shovels, well drillers,
motorized bicycles as defined in section 307.180, electric
bicycles as defined in section 301.010, and every vehicle
which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead
wires but not operated upon rails;
(6) "Nonresident", a person not a resident of the
state of Missouri;
(7) "Nonresident's operating privilege", the privilege
conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state
pertaining to the operation by him of a motor vehicle, or
the use of a motor vehicle owned by him in this state;
(8) "Operator", a person who is in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle;
(9) "Owner", a person who holds the legal title to a
motor vehicle; or in the event a motor vehicle is the
subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease
thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the
conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate
right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or
lessee, or in the event a mortgagor of a motor vehicle is
entitled to possession thereof, then such conditional vendee
or lessee or mortgagor;
(10) "Proof of financial responsibility", proof of
ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of

SB 1289 3
accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of said
proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a
motor vehicle, in the amount of [twenty-five] fifty thousand
dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person
in any one accident, and, subject to said limit for one
person, in the amount of [fifty] one hundred thousand
dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more
persons in any one accident, and in the amount of [twenty-
five] fifty thousand dollars because of injury to or
destruction of property of others in any one accident;
(11) "Registration", registration certificate or
certificates and registration plates issued under the laws
of this state pertaining to the registration of motor
vehicles;
(12) "State", any state, territory or possession of
the United States, the District of Columbia, or any province
of the Dominion of Canada;
(13) "Street" or "highway", the entire width between
property lines of every way or place of whatever nature when
any part thereof is open to the use of the public, as a
matter of right, for purposes of vehicular traffic.
303.190. 1. A "motor vehicle liability policy" as
said term is used in this chapter shall mean an owner's or
an operator's policy of liability insurance, certified as
provided in section 303.170 or section 303.180 as proof of
financial responsibility, and issued, except as otherwise
provided in section 303.180 by an insurance carrier duly
authorized to transact business in this state, to or for the
benefit of the person named therein as insured.
2. Such owner's policy of liability insurance:

SB 1289 4
(1) Shall designate by explicit description or by
appropriate reference all motor vehicles with respect to
which coverage is thereby to be granted;
(2) Shall insure the person named therein and any
other person, as insured, using any such motor vehicle or
motor vehicles with the express or implied permission of
such named insured, against loss from the liability imposed
by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance
or use of such motor vehicle or motor vehicles within the
United States of America or the Dominion of Canada, subject
to limits, exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to
each such motor vehicle, as follows: [twenty-five] fifty
thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one
person in any one accident and, subject to said limit for
one person, [fifty] one hundred thousand dollars because of
bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one
accident, and [twenty-five] fifty thousand dollars because
of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one
accident; and
(3) May exclude coverage against loss from liability
imposed by law for damages arising out of the use of such
motor vehicles by a member of the named insured's household
who is a specifically excluded driver in the policy.
3. Such operator's policy of liability insurance shall
insure the person named as insured therein against loss from
the liability imposed upon him or her by law for damages
arising out of the use by him or her of any motor vehicle
not owned by him or her, within the said territorial limits
and subject to the same limits of liability as are set forth
above with respect to any owner's policy of liability
insurance.

SB 1289 5
4. Such motor vehicle liability policy shall state the
name and address of the named insured, the coverage afforded
by the policy, the premium charged therefor, the policy
period and the limits of liability, and shall contain an
agreement or be endorsed that insurance is provided
thereunder in accordance with the coverage defined in this
chapter as respects bodily injury and death or property
damage, or both, and is subject to all the provisions of
this chapter.
5. Such motor vehicle liability policy need not insure
any liability pursuant to any workers' compensation law nor
any liability on account of bodily injury to or death of an
employee of the insured while engaged in the employment,
other than domestic, of the insured, or while engaged in the
operation, maintenance or repair of any such motor vehicle
nor any liability for damage to property owned by, rented
to, in charge of or transported by the insured.
6. Every motor vehicle liability policy shall be
subject to the following provisions which need not be
contained therein:
(1) The liability of the insurance carrier with
respect to the insurance required by this chapter shall
become absolute whenever injury or damage covered by said
motor vehicle liability policy occurs; said policy may not
be cancelled or annulled as to such liability by any
agreement between the insurance carrier and the insured
after the occurrence of the injury or damage; no statement
made by the insured or on his or her behalf and no violation
of said policy shall defeat or void said policy;
(2) The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for
such injury or damage shall not be a condition precedent to

SB 1289 6
the right or duty of the insurance carrier to make payment
on account of such injury or damage;
(3) The insurance carrier shall have the right to
settle any claim covered by the policy, and if such
settlement is made in good faith, the amount thereof shall
be deductible from the limits of liability specified in
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section;
(4) The policy, the written application thereof, if
any, and any rider or endorsement which does not conflict
with the provisions of this chapter shall constitute the
entire contract between the parties.
7. Any policy which grants the coverage required for a
motor vehicle liability policy may also grant any lawful
coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage
specified for a motor vehicle liability policy and such
excess or additional coverage shall not be subject to the
provisions of this chapter. With respect to a policy which
grants such excess or additional coverage the term "motor
vehicle liability policy" shall apply only to that part of
the coverage which is required by this section.
8. Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide that
the insured shall reimburse the insurance carrier for any
payment the insurance carrier would not have been obligated
to make under the terms of the policy except for the
provisions of this chapter.
9. Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide for
the prorating of the insurance thereunder with other valid
and collectible insurance.
100 10. The requirements of a motor vehicle liability
101 policy may be fulfilled by the policies of one or more
102 insurance carriers which policies together meet such
103 requirements.

SB 1289 7
104 11. Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor
105 vehicle liability policy shall be deemed to fulfill the
106 requirement for such a policy.
379.204. Any underinsured motor vehicle coverage [with
limits of liability less than two times the limits for
bodily injury or death pursuant to section 303.020] shall be
construed to provide coverage in excess of the liability
coverage of any [underinsured] motor vehicle involved in the
accident.
✓